Washington statutes.
RCW 7.113.030

Remedies.

(1) In an action under this chapter, the court may award any or all of the following remedies upon request:

(a) Compensatory damages;

(b) Punitive damages;

(c) Statutory damages of $5,000 per violation;

(d) Injunctive relief; and

(e) Any other relief the court deems appropriate.

(2) In determining punitive damages, the court may take into consideration any previous findings of liability against a defendant pursuant to this section.

(3) The court shall award costs and reasonable attorneys' fees to the prevailing plaintiff.

(4) In an action brought under this section, the plaintiff may ask the court to require the defendant to attend counseling sessions. If ordered to attend counseling, the defendant shall be financially responsible for the counseling fees and any related expenses.

(5) An award under this section may not be used to offset any child support obligations.

(6) The rights and remedies provided in this section are in addition to any other rights and remedies provided by law and may not be construed to prohibit, limit, or to be a prerequisite to any other cause of action or remedy.

[ 2024 c 254 s 3.]